Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-4617
Spread pricing; prohibited, when.

(1) A contract between a pharmacy benefit manager and a health benefit plan that is issued on or after January 1, 2026, shall not contain spread pricing unless such contract is an extension of a contract entered into prior to January 1, 2026, which included spread pricing.

(2) Beginning January 1, 2029, no contract between a pharmacy benefit manager and a health benefit plan shall include spread pricing.

Laws 2025, LB198, § 8.